North Carolina, session 2025, HB574.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Purpose. – The purpose of this act is to provide a framework for
funds to the Office of State Budget and Management to be allocated to the North Carolina
Workforce Development Coalition (NCWDC), a nonprofit organization for the purpose of
providing grants to employers to encourage employer-sponsored training with a focus on
increasing job creation, reducing employee turnover, improving employee wages, and upgrading
the skills of workers in their occupation. NCWDC will identify and prioritize industries and
skillsets (i) for which training and curricula are lacking at community colleges due to insufficient
demand despite an ongoing societal or community need or (ii) for which significant portions of
training occur on-the-job without formalized study programs at institutions of higher education.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Eligible employer. – A North Carolina-based business, including nonprofit
organizations, that (i) has at least 20 but not more than 1,500 employees
employed in the State and (ii) meets all of the following requirements:
a. Has been operating for a continuous period of at least 365 days.
b. Is registered and in good standing with the North Carolina
Unemployment Insurance program.
c. Is registered and in good standing with the North Carolina Workers'
Compensation program.
d. Is registered and in good standing with the North Carolina Secretary
of State's office, if required by law.
(2) Eligible training programs. – A training program (i) offered through an
eligible employer, association, or educational institution and (ii) for which the
eligible employer demonstrates the training directly relates to the trainee's
occupation or work responsibilities and will result in one or more of the
following:
a. Create new jobs.
b. Reduce employee turnover.
c. Enhance employee effectiveness.
d. Improve employee wages.
e. Upgrade employee skillsets.
*H574-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Employee. – An individual (i) employed by an eligible employer, (ii) working
in this State for at least 30 hours per week, and (iii) for whom the eligible
employer has applied to participate in an eligible training program. The term
includes interns and apprentices, paid or unpaid, who work for an eligible
employer at least 30 hours per week.
(4) Trainee. – An employee participating in an eligible training program.
(5) Training costs. – Costs of an eligible training program for tuition; registration;
class fees; participant fees; class materials directly related to the training;
instructor fees, including in-house trainers; assessments, testing, and fees for
license or certification exams that are administered as part of the training
program. The term does not include expenses incurred for trainee wages,
onboarding costs for new employees, fringe benefits, lodging and meals,
capital construction, membership fees, license fees, subscription fees,
employer administrative fees, purchased, rented, or leased equipment,
including computer hardware or software, and expenses related to preparing
training grant applications.
SECTION 1.(c) Grants. – An eligible employer may apply for a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) fifty percent (50%) of the eligible training costs or (ii) two thousand dollars ($2,000)
per trainee, regardless of the number of business entities the trainee works for. The maximum
grant an eligible employer may receive in a calendar year is forty thousand dollars ($40,000)
minus any other State or federal grants for the same training received in that calendar year.
SECTION 1.(d) Application; Reimbursement. – An application for a grant must be
submitted to NCWDC at least 45 days prior to the start of training. NCWDC shall distribute
funds to eligible employers who apply and qualify based on a first-come, first-served basis until
funds are exhausted. Grant funds shall be paid to an eligible employer only after the eligible
employer has submitted a request for reimbursement meeting the following requirements:
(1) The request for reimbursement is submitted to NCWDC no later than 60 days
following completion of training.
(2) The request for reimbursement provides all information required by NCWDC
to substantiate the training costs on which the application for grant was based.
(3) Each trainee to which the request applies has (i) completed the training and
(ii) remained an employee of the eligible employer for the 45-day period
following the date of completion of the training, unless activated for military
service or deceased.
SECTION 1.(e) Reporting. – Each eligible employer shall maintain, and make
available to NCWDC, appropriate employee records of eligibility criteria for employment and
training as required by NCWDC to verify compliance with the requirements of this section and
substantiate the amount of reimbursement based on the grant awarded. Beginning July 1, 2026,
and annually thereafter, NCWDC shall report to the Joint Legislative Economic Development
and Global Engagement Oversight Committee on the number and amount of grants awarded, the
recipients of the grants, the number of trainees participating as a result of the grants awarded, the
types of training offered as a result of the grants, and any information reported as to trainees
retained in employment as a result of the training.
SECTION 1.(f) Administration. – NCWDC may use up to five percent (5%) of the
funds available for the program for administrative expenses and marketing of the program,
including developing a website and collateral materials to inform employers of the program,
email and social media campaigns, and direct outreach.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 574-First Edition